Massachusetts, session 194th, H4957.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 28(f) the following section: 
Section 28. (g) Any coverage offered by the commission to any active or retired 
employee of the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide 
coverage for pain control methods during intrauterine device insertion, including but not limited 
to intravenous sedation, oral sedation, nitrous oxide, local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as 
prescribed by a provider, acting within their scope of practice. 
(h) (1) Coverage provided under subjection (g) shall not be subject to any deductible, 
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement, except as provided for in 
subclauses (A) and (B) of clause (i) of subsection (a) or as otherwise required under federal law. 
Coverage offered under this section shall not impose unreasonable restrictions or delays in the 
coverage; provided, however, that reasonable medical management techniques may be applied to 
coverage within a method category, as defined by the FDA, but not across types of methods. 

of 8 14  (2) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall also be provided for such enrollee’s 
covered spouse and covered dependents. 
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny or restrict in any way the group 
insurance commission’s authority to ensure plan compliance with this chapter. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting in section 10K the following subsections: 
(g) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance 
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract 
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage 
for pain control methods during interuterine device insertion, including but not limited to 
intravenous sedation, oral sedation, nitrous oxide, local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as 
prescribed by a provider, acting within their scope of practice. 
(h) (1) Coverage provided under subjection (g) shall not be subject to any deductible, 
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement, except as provided for in 
subclauses (A) and (B) of clause (i) of subsection (a) or as otherwise required under federal law. 
Coverage provided under this section shall not impose unreasonable restrictions or delays in the 
coverage; provided, however, that reasonable medical management techniques may be applied to 
coverage within a method category, as defined by the FDA, but not across types of methods. 
(2) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for such enrollee’s 
covered spouse and covered dependents. 

of 8 34  (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny or restrict in any way the division of 
medical assistance’s authority to ensure its contracted health insurers, health plans, health 
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators 
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan are in 
compliance with this chapter. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 47W(j) the following subsections: 
(k) An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 
108 that provides hospital expense and surgical expense and any group blanket policy of accident 
and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 110 that provides hospital expense and surgical 
expense insurance, delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the 
policyholder, within or without the Commonwealth, (hereinafter “policy”) shall provide benefits 
for residents of the Commonwealth and all group members having a principal place of 
employment within the Commonwealth coverage for pain control methods during interuterine 
device insertion, including but not limited to intravenous sedation, oral sedation, nitrous oxide, 
local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as prescribed by a provider, acting within their scope of 
practice. 
(l) (1) Coverage provided under subsection (k) shall not be subject to any deductible, 
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement, except as provided for in 
subclauses (A) and (B) of clause (i) of subsection (d) or as otherwise required under federal law. 
Coverage offered under said subsection (d) shall not impose unreasonable restrictions or delays 
in the coverage, in accordance with the requirements of chapter 176O; provided, however, that 

of 8 56 reasonable medical management techniques may be applied to coverage within a method 
category, as defined by the FDA, but not across types of methods. 
(2) Benefits for an enrollee shall be the same for such enrollee’s covered spouse and 
covered dependents. 
(m) A policy of accident and sickness insurance that is purchased by an employer that is a 
church or qualified church-controlled organization shall be exempt from subsection (k) at the 
request of the employer. 
(n) The commissioner of insurance shall ensure that plans issued under subsection (k) 
comply with this chapter. 
(o) For purposes of this section, the definitions in subsection (j) apply. 
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 8W(j) the following subsections: 
(k) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group 
hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the Commonwealth 
and that provides benefits for outpatient services shall provide to all individual subscribers and 
members within the Commonwealth and to all group members having a principal place of 
employment within the Commonwealth coverage for pain control methods during interuterine 
device insertion, including but not limited to intravenous sedation, oral sedation, nitrous oxide, 
local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as prescribed by a provider, acting within their scope of 
practice. 

of 8 76  (l) Coverage provided under subsection (k) shall not be subject to any deductible, 
coinsurance, copayment or any cost-sharing requirement except as provided for in subclauses 
(A) and (B) of clause (i) of subsection (d) or as otherwise required under federal law. Coverage 
offered under subsection (k) shall not impose any unreasonable restriction or delay in the 
coverage, in accordance with the requirements of chapter 176O; provided, however, that 
reasonable medical management techniques may be applied to coverage within a method 
category, as defined by the FDA, but not across types of methods. 
(m) (1) The requirements of subsection (k) shall not apply to a contract between a 
subscriber and a corporation under an individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, 
issued, or renewed within or without the Commonwealth that is purchased by an employer that is 
a church or qualified church-controlled organization. 
(2) A church or qualified church-controlled organization that invokes the exemption 
provided under subsection (m)(1) shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to 
enrollment with the plan, listing the contraceptive health care methods and services such 
employer refuses to cover for religious reasons. 
(n) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to deny or restrict in any way the 
division of insurance’s authority to ensure contract compliance with this chapter. 
(o) For purposes of this section, the definitions set forth in section (j) of this chapter shall 
apply, unless the context clearly requires otherwise. 
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4W(j) the following subsections: 

of 8 97  (k) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement 
that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the Commonwealth and that provides 
benefits for outpatient services shall provide to all individual subscribers and members within the 
100 Commonwealth and to all group members having a principal place of employment within the 
101 Commonwealth coverage for all of the following services and contraceptive methods for pain 
102 control methods during intrauterine device insertion, including but not limited to intravenous 
103 sedation, oral sedation, nitrous oxide, local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as prescribed by a 
104 provider, acting within their scope of practice. 
105  (l) (1) A medical service agreement subject to subsection (k) shall not impose a 
106 deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage 
107 provided. 
108  (2) Benefits for an enrollee under this subsection shall be the same for such enrollee’s 
109 covered spouse and covered dependents. 
110  (m) (1) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to a medical service 
111 agreement that is delivered, issued, or renewed within or without the Commonwealth that is 
112 purchased by an employer that is a church or qualified church-controlled organization. 
113  (2) A church or qualified church-controlled organization that invokes the exemption 
114 provided under subsection (m)(1) shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to 
115 enrollment with the plan, listing the contraceptive health care methods and services the employer 
116 refuses to cover for religious reasons. 

of 8 117  (n) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to deny or restrict in any way the 
118 division of insurance’s authority to ensure medical service agreement compliance with this 
119 chapter. 
120  (o) For purposes of this section, the definitions set forth in subsection (j) shall apply, 
121 unless the context clearly requires otherwise. 
122  SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
123 inserting after section 4O(j) the following subsections: 
124  (k) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, renewed or 
125 delivered within or without the Commonwealth and that provides benefits for outpatient 
126 prescription drugs or devices shall provide to residents of the Commonwealth and to persons 
127 having a principal place of employment within the Commonwealth coverage for pain control 
128 methods during intrauterine device insertion, including but not limited to intravenous sedation, 
129 oral sedation, nitrous oxide, local anesthesia, or topical anesthesia as prescribed by a provider, 
130 acting within their scope of practice. 
131  (l) (1) Coverage provided under subsection (k) shall not be subject to any deductible, 
132 coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement except as provided for in 
133 subclauses (A) and (B) of clause (i) of subsection (d) or otherwise as required under federal law. 
134 Coverage offered under said subsection (d) shall not impose unreasonable restrictions or delays 
135 in the coverage, in accordance with the requirements of chapter 176O; provided, however, that 
136 reasonable medical management techniques may be applied to coverage within a method 
137 category, as defined by the FDA, but not across types of methods. 

of 8 138  (2) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for such enrollee’s 
139 covered spouse and covered dependents. 
140  (m) (1) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to a health maintenance 
141 contract if that policy is purchased by an employer that is a church or qualified church-controlled 
142 organization. 
143  (2) A church or qualified church-controlled organization that invokes the exemption 
144 provided under subsection (m)(1) shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to 
145 enrollment with the plan, listing the contraceptive health care services the employer refuses to 
146 cover for religious reasons. 
147  (n) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to deny or restrict in any way the 
148 division of insurance’s authority to ensure health maintenance contract compliance with this 
149 chapter. 
150  (o) For purposes of this section, the definitions in subjection (j) shall apply, unless the 
151 context clearly requires otherwise.